Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1519
Judge or clerk of election; prohibited acts; penalty.

(1) Any judge of election who (a) knowingly receives or sanctions the reception of an improper or illegal vote from any person who is not a registered voter, (b) receives or sanctions the reception of a ballot from any person who refuses to answer any question which is put to him or her in accordance with the Election Act, (c) refuses to take the oath prescribed by the act, (d) sanctions the refusal by any other judge of election to administer any oath required by the act when such oath is required, or (e) refuses to receive or sanctions the rejection of a ballot from any registered voter at the place where such registered voter properly and legally offers to vote shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

(2) Any judge or clerk of election on whom any duty is enjoined by the act who willfully neglects any such duty or who engages in any corrupt conduct in the discharge of his or her duty shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 418.